Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,110
Local truck; special permit; fee.

Any owner of a motor vehicle registered as a local truck may make application to the department for a special permit authorizing operation of such local truck on the highways of this state beyond the limits specified by law for local trucks for the sole purpose of having such truck equipped, modified, or serviced. The operator of the local truck shall have such permit in his or her possession at all times when he or she is operating such local truck beyond the limits specified by law for the local truck and shall display such permit upon demand of proper authorities. The fee for this permit shall be five dollars payable to the department. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 110.